src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kealgal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩeâlǥal â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Nom: ǩeâlǥal
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Gen: ǩeâlggal
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Acc: ǩeâlggal
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Ill: ǩeâlggla
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Loc: ǩeâlgglest
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Com: ǩeâlgglin
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Ess: ǩeâlgglen
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Par: ǩeâlggled
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Abe: [ǩeâlggaltaa, ǩeâlggaltää]
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Nom: ǩeâlggal
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Gen: ǩeâlggli
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Acc: ǩeâlgglid
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Ill: ǩeâlgglid
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Loc: ǩeâlgglin
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Com: ǩeâlgglivuiʹm
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Abe: [ǩeâlgglitaa, ǩeâlgglitää]
